New Jersey, session 222, A1501.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each principal department in the Executive Branch of State Government shall prepare a monthly report measuring its performance based on five performance metrics as determined by the commissioner or head of each department.  The report shall include trending analysis and benchmarking data surrounding the metrics.  The report shall be published monthly on the departments website. Each department shall issue an annual report summarizing the monthly findings published throughout the year to the State Comptroller, the Governor, and the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1). 2. This act shall take effect immediately.